Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,151
Workers' compensation insurance; association authorized to obtain for members.

An association which has a constitution and bylaws and has been organized in this state for not less than two years and is maintained in good faith for purposes other than that of obtaining insurance may obtain individual workers' compensation insurance policies through an insurance producer licensed under the Insurance Producers Licensing Act for any or all of the voting members of the association covering the liability to which each individual employer may be subject under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act from an insurer authorized to transact the business of workers' compensation insurance in this state.

Laws 1996, LB 515, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 24.

Insurance Producers Licensing Act, see section 44-4047.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.